Missouri, session 2026, HB3453.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 50.530, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 50.530, to read as follows:
50.530. As used in sections 50.530 to 50.745:
(1) "Accounting officer" means county auditor in counties of the first and second
classifications and the county clerks in counties of the third and fourth classifications;
(2) "Budget officer" means such person, as may, from time to time, be appointed by
the county commission of counties of the first classification except in counties of the first
classification with a population of less than one hundred thousand inhabitants [according to
the official United States Census of 1970] the county auditor shall be the chief budget officer,
the presiding commissioner of the county commission in counties of the second classification,
unless the county commission designates the county clerk as budget officer, and the county
clerk in counties of the third and fourth classification.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.